fst/verb_paradigms.lexc
! 118 — dātun (preterite) stem='dāi'
LEXICON V118_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:dāi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:dāi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:dāi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:dāi  # ;

! 119 — jātwei (present) stem='jāma'
LEXICON V119_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:jāma  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:jāsei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:jāt  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:i  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:jātei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:jāt  # ;

! 119 — jātwei (preterite) stem='jāja'
LEXICON V119_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:jāja  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:jāja  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:jāja  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:jāja  # ;

! 120 — skītwei (present) stem='skīma'
LEXICON V120_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:skīma  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:skīsei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:skīt  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:i  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:skītei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:skīt  # ;

! 120 — skītwei (preterite) stem='skīja'
LEXICON V120_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:skīja  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:skīja  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:skīja  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:skīmai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:skītei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:skīja  # ;

! 121 — dītun (present) stem='dīma'
LEXICON V121_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:dīma  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:dīsei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:dīt  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:i  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:dītei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:dīt  # ;

! 121 — dītun (preterite) stem='dīja'
LEXICON V121_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:dīja  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:dīja  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:dīja  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:dīmai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:dītei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:dīja  # ;

! 122 — waīstun (present) stem='waīd'
LEXICON V122_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 122 — waīstun (preterite) stem='waīda'
LEXICON V122_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:waīda  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:waīda  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:waīda  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:waīda  # ;

! 123 — skrītwei (present) stem='skreīma'
LEXICON V123_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:skreīma  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:skrēima  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:skreīsei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:skrēisei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:skreīt  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:skrēit  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:i  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:skrēimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:skreītei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:skrēitei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:skreīt  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:skrēit  # ;

! 123 — skrītwei (preterite) stem='skrijja'
LEXICON V123_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:skrijja  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:skrijja  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:skrijja  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:skrīmai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:skrītei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:skrijja  # ;

! 124 — snigtwei (present) stem='snēig'
LEXICON V124_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:t  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:t  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:t  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:t  # ;

! 124 — snigtwei (preterite) stem='snigga'
LEXICON V124_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:snigga  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:snigga  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:snigga  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:snigga  # ;

! 125 — migtwei (present) stem='meīgma'
LEXICON V125_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:meīgma  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:mēigma  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:meīgsei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:mēigt  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:meīgt  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:mēigt  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:i  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:mēigmai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:meīgtei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:mēigtei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:meīgt  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:mēigt  # ;

! 125 — migtwei (preterite) stem='migga'
LEXICON V125_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:migga  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:migga  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:migga  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:migga  # ;

! 126 — wiltwei (present) stem='will'
LEXICON V126_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 126 — wiltwei (preterite) stem='willa'
LEXICON V126_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:willa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:willa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:willa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:willimai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:willitei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:willa  # ;

! 127 — jāstun (present) stem='jāsma'
LEXICON V127_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:jāsma  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:jāsei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:jāst  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:i  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:jāstei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:jāst  # ;

! 127 — jāstun (preterite) stem='jāsa'
LEXICON V127_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:jāsa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:jāsa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:jāsa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:jāsa  # ;

! 128 — sīstwei (present) stem='sīnd'
LEXICON V128_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:sēnda  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:sēnda  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:sēnda  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:sēndimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:sēnditei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:sēnda  # ;

! 128 — sīstwei (preterite) stem='sīda'
LEXICON V128_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:sīda  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Sg:sēda  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:sīda  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Sg:sēda  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:sīda  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Sg:sēda  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:sēdamai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:sēdatei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:sīda  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Pl:sēda  # ;

! 131 — pūdatun (present) stem='pūdai'
LEXICON V131_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:pūdai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:auskīpai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:pūdai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:auskīpai  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:pūdai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:auskīpai  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:auskīpaimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:auskīpaitei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:pūdai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:auskīpai  # ;

! 131 — pūdatun (preterite) stem='pūdai'
LEXICON V131_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:pūdai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Sg:auskīpai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:pūdai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Sg:auskīpai  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:pūdai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Sg:auskīpai  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:auskīpaimai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:auskīpaitei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:pūdai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Pl:auskīpai  # ;

! 132 — maitātun (present) stem='maitāi'
LEXICON V132_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:maitāi  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:maitāi  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:maitāi  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:maitāi  # ;

! 132 — maitātun (preterite) stem='maitāi'
LEXICON V132_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:maitāi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:maitāi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:maitāi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:maitāi  # ;

! 133 — kāimalukitun (present) stem='kāimalukei'
LEXICON V133_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:kāimalukei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:kāimalukjai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:kāimalukei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:kāimalukjai  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:kāimalukei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:kāimalukjai  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:kāimalukjaimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:kāimalukjaitei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:kāimalukei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:kāimalukjai  # ;

! 133 — kāimalukitun (preterite) stem='kāimalukei'
LEXICON V133_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:kāimalukei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Sg:kāimaluki  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:kāimalukei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Sg:kāimaluki  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:kāimalukei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Sg:kāimaluki  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:kāimalukimai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:kāimalukitei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:kāimalukei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Pl:kāimaluki  # ;

! 134 — segītun (present) stem='segēi'
LEXICON V134_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:segēi  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:segēi  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:segēi  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:segēi  # ;

! 134 — segītun (preterite) stem='segēi'
LEXICON V134_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:segēi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:segēi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:segēi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:segēi  # ;

! 134a — bilītun (present) stem='bilāi'
LEXICON V134a_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:bilāi  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:bilāi  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:bilāi  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:bilāi  # ;

! 134a — bilītun (preterite) stem='bilāi'
LEXICON V134a_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:bilāi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:bilāi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:bilāi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:bilāi  # ;

! 135 — līkitun (present) stem='līki'
LEXICON V135_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:līki  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:palīki  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:līki  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:palīki  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:līki  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:palīki  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:palīkimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:palīkitei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:līki  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:palīki  # ;

! 135 — līkitun (preterite) stem='līki'
LEXICON V135_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:līki  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Sg:palīkei  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:līki  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Sg:palīkei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:līki  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Sg:palīkei  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:palīkeimai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:palīkeitei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:līki  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Pl:palīkei  # ;

! 136 — klantītun (present) stem='klant'
LEXICON V136_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 136 — klantītun (preterite) stem='klantēi'
LEXICON V136_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:klantēi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:klantēi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:klantēi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:klantēi  # ;

! 137 — turītun (present) stem='turri'
LEXICON V137_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:turri  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:turri  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:turri  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:turri  # ;

! 137 — turītun (preterite) stem='turēi'
LEXICON V137_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:turēi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:turēi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:turēi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:turēi  # ;

! 137a — milītun (present) stem='mīli'
LEXICON V137a_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:mīli  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:mīli  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:mīli  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:mīli  # ;

! 137a — milītun (preterite) stem='milāi'
LEXICON V137a_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:milāi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:milāi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:milāi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:milāi  # ;

! 138 — grīkitun (present) stem='abōni'
LEXICON V138_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:abōni  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:abōni  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:abōni  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:abōni  # ;

! 138 — grīkitun (preterite) stem='abōni'
LEXICON V138_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:abōni  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:abōni  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:abōni  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:abōni  # ;
